Utah statutes.
59-15-109 (Superseded 07/01/11).   Tax moneys to be paid to state treasurer.

(1)  Taxes collected under this chapter shall be paid by the commission to the state treasurer daily for deposit as follows:

(a)  for fiscal year 2003-04:

(i)  $2,525,666 shall be deposited into the Alcoholic Beverage Enforcement and Treatment Restricted Account created in Section 32A-1-115; and

(ii)  the revenue collected in excess of $2,525,666 shall be deposited into the General Fund;

(b)  for fiscal year 2004-05:

(i)  $3,133,777 shall be deposited into the Alcoholic Beverage Enforcement and Treatment Restricted Account created in Section 32A-1-115; and

(ii)  the revenue collected in excess of $3,133,777 shall be deposited into the General Fund;

(c)  for fiscal year 2005-06:

(i)  $3,741,888 shall be deposited into the Alcoholic Beverage Enforcement and Treatment Restricted Account created in Section 32A-1-115; and

(ii)  the revenue collected in excess of $3,741,888 shall be deposited into the General Fund;

(d)  for fiscal year 2006-07:

(i)  $4,350,000 shall be deposited into the Alcoholic Beverage Enforcement and Treatment Restricted Account created in Section 32A-1-115; and

(ii)  the revenue collected in excess of $4,350,000 shall be deposited into the General Fund; and

(e)  beginning with fiscal year 2007-08:

(i)  the greater of the following shall be deposited into the Alcoholic Beverage Enforcement and Treatment Restricted Account created in Section 32A-1-115:

(A)  40% of the revenue collected for the fiscal year two years preceding the fiscal year for which the deposit is made; or

(B)  $4,350,000; and

(ii)  the revenue collected in excess of the amount deposited in accordance with Subsection (1)(e)(i) shall be deposited into the General Fund.

(2) (a)  Beginning with September 1, 2006, the commission shall notify the entities described in Subsection (2)(b) not later than the September 1 preceding the fiscal year of the deposit of:

(i)  the amount of the proceeds of the beer excise tax collected in accordance with this section for the fiscal year two years preceding the fiscal year of deposit; and

(ii)  an amount equal to 40% of the amount listed in Subsection (2)(a)(i).

(b)  The notification required by Subsection (2)(a) shall be sent to:

(i)  the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget; and

(ii)  the Legislative Fiscal Analyst.

